Utah statutes.
17B-1-207.   Signature on request may be used on petition.

A signature on a request may be used toward fulfilling the signature requirement of a petition:

(1)  if the request notifies the signer in conspicuous language that the signature, unless withdrawn, would also be used for purposes of a petition to create a local district; and

(2)  unless the signer files a written withdrawal of the signature before the petition is filed.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 329, 2007 General Session

